Utah statutes.
59-10-520.   Time and place for paying tax shown on returns.

(1)  When a return of tax is required under this chapter or rules, the person required to make such return shall, without assessment or notice and demand from the commission, pay such tax to the commission office with which the return is filed, and shall pay such tax at the time and place fixed for filing the return (determined without regard to any extension of time).

(2)  In any case where a tax is required to be paid on or before a certain date, or within a certain period, any reference in this chapter to the date fixed for payment of such tax shall be deemed a reference to the last day fixed for such payment (determined without regard to any extension of time for paying the tax).

